Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.430

Local school district superintendents to advise board and superintendent.

The superintendents of all local school districts within an educational service district shall serve in an advisory capacity to the educational service district board and superintendent in matters pertaining to budgets, programs, policy, and staff.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 37; 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 28; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 23. Formerly RCW 28A.21.220, 28.19.605.]

NOTES:

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 282: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.

Severability—Rights preserved—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.